Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 8.5 Community Mental Health Services

40.1-8.5-1.
Policy and purpose.

The state recognizes that children and adults with mental disabilities are entitled to appropriate, accessible, and adequate mental health services in the least restrictive environment that appropriately can serve their needs.

The state recognizes private, nonprofit community mental health centers that provide mental health services to children and adults with mental disabilities, and it is the policy of the state to support these mental health centers as an adjunct and alternative to inpatient services. The state shall fund community mental health centers and shall provide a mechanism by which the state and local governments share responsibility for ensuring community mental health services to mentally disabled children and adults and/or those who are unable to pay for mental health services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 390, § 2.

40.1-8.5-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Audit” means an annual financial accounting of a center’s financial situation, conducted by a certified public accountant, within one hundred twenty (120) days from the end of the center’s fiscal year, and that includes, for the year reviewed and the immediate preceding year, full financial disclosure of the center’s assets, liabilities, fund balances, revenues, and expenditures by program, and a verification of matchable funds for the year reviewed.

“Board” means the community mental health board created pursuant to this chapter as the governing body of the community mental health center.

“Center” means the community mental health center which is a local, nonprofit entity organized and incorporated pursuant to the laws of the state, governed by a board, and recognized by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals as the community mental health center for a designated mental health service area.

“Department” means the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Director” means the director of the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Fiscal year” means the fiscal year used by the state.

“Matching grant funds” means state funds in an amount up to and not more than four dollars ($4.00) for each dollar of matchable funds, certified and budgeted in accordance with this chapter. Matching grant funds excludes, but may be in addition to, other funds provided by the state for mental health services.

“Mental disability” means any mental disorder in which the capacity of the person to exercise self-control or judgment in the conduct of his or her affairs and social relations or to care for his or her personal needs is impaired.

“Mental health services” means those services provided to mentally disabled children and adults and shall include, but not be limited to, psychiatric, medical, nursing, psychological, social, rehabilitative, and support services provided in the prevention, diagnosis, treatment, and follow-up of mental disabilities, and in addition, may include those services designed to prevent mental disabilities or be of a consultative, informational, or educational nature about mental disabilities.

“Mental health service area” herein also referred to as “service area,” means the geographical area within the boundaries of cities and towns, as designated by the director.

“Participating municipalities” means those cities and towns that provide funds to a particular community mental health center for mental health services and receive matching grant-fund-supported services from that community mental health center.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 390, § 2.

40.1-8.5-3.
Matchable funds.

Matchable funds are those dollars received, whether through a grant by a center for the general provision of mental health services, excluding funds for capital expenditures, and received from one or more of the following:

Individual or business charitable gifts;

Community fund raising net dollars;

Unrestricted donations;

A participating municipality.

The director may authorize a center to include as matchable funds those federal funds the center received directly from the federal government for the provision of mental health services when:

The director determines that without the inclusion of federal funds provided, mental health services to the uninsured or to high-risk populations in the center’s service area will be seriously deficient or disrupted; and

The federal funds are not subject to statutory or regulatory restrictions or requirements that would prevent their use as matchable funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 390, § 2.

40.1-8.5-4.
Community mental health boards — Composition.

Each community mental health center shall be governed by a board composed of at least nine (9) members of recognized ability and/or interest in the problems of mental health and substance abuse. Community mental health boards referred to in this chapter shall be incorporated under the laws of Rhode Island and governed by their bylaws. Members of the community mental health boards shall be derived through nonprofit corporation structures. The membership of each board shall reflect, as much as possible, the diversity of the center’s mental health service area and the consumers it serves.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 390, § 2.

40.1-8.5-5.
Powers and duties of community mental health boards.

Subject to the provisions of this section and the rules and regulations of the director, each board shall:

Identify the mental health service needs of its service area population;

Assess the mental health services available to meet the mental health needs within its service area;

Review and evaluate the mental health services provided by its center;

Ensure that the mental health services offered by its center with matchable funds and match address the identified mental health service needs of the service area to the maximum extent possible within the limits of the appropriated and allocated matching grant funds;

Be available to the department to plan and coordinate the development and delivery of mental health services within its service area;

Prepare and approve a plan and budget, prepared in accordance with department requirements, for the delivery of mental health services to be provided by its center with resources, including, but not limited to, matchable funds and matching grant funds; the plan and budget to be submitted annually to the department for its approval;

Develop and implement a mechanism by which its center’s consumers and family members of its consumers participate in the overall goals, objectives, and methods of the center, as reflected in its plan;

Solicit public and private financial support for mental health services provided by its center;

Promote and approve contractual agreements with other state, federal, local, and private agencies, e.g., social service, judicial, health, and education entities, as it deems necessary;

Employ the executive administrator of its center and, in the event such a position is vacant, assume the functions of that position;

Arrange for and review its center’s audit;

Ensure that funds available pursuant to this chapter are used to provide mental health services to those who do not have the ability to pay and that each client’s eligibility to receive public or private assistance is exhausted prior to the expenditure of state and local monies available pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 390, § 2.

40.1-8.5-6.
Appropriation and allocation of matching grant funds.

The state’s appropriations for the department shall be sufficient to provide matching grant funds as defined in this chapter.

Matching grant funds shall be allocated annually to each board by the department, in accordance with this chapter, and shall be based on the plan and budget for the funding period submitted to the department by the board and the matchable funds received and certified in its audit for the next to last year preceding the funding year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 390, § 2.

40.1-8.5-7.
Power and duties of director.

In addition to the powers and duties delineated elsewhere in this chapter and other powers and duties already conferred by law, the director shall:

Promulgate administrative and fiscal regulations necessary to carry out the requirements of this chapter;

Plan and coordinate, with the assistance of the boards, the development and delivery of comprehensive mental health services within each service area;

Establish guidelines for general evaluation procedures to ensure program quality;

Review each board’s overall plan and budget and approve the expenditure of department funds;

Provide consultative staff services to each board, as needed;

Require assurances from each board that no persons within its area are denied service on the basis of race, creed, color, gender, age, disability, or sexual preference;

Require assurances from each board that no person will be denied service based on the person’s ability to pay, contingent upon the availability of resources;

Require assurances from each board that hiring of staff, full or part-time, is done without discrimination on the basis of race, creed, color, gender, age, disability, sexual preference, or political affiliation and is in compliance with state and federal laws;

Provide qualified department personnel under the supervision of the director to monitor implementation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 390, § 2.

40.1-8.5-8.
Certified community behavioral health clinics.

The executive office of health and human services is authorized and directed to submit to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment for the purposes of establishing Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics in accordance with Section 223 of the federal Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014.

The executive office of health and human services shall amend its Title XIX state plan pursuant to Title XIX [42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.] and Title XXI [42 U.S.C § 1397 et seq.] of the Social Security Act as necessary to cover all required services for persons with mental health and substance use disorders at a certified community behavioral health clinic through a daily or monthly bundled payment methodology that is specific to each organization’s anticipated costs and inclusive of all required services within Section 223 of the federal Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014. Such certified community behavioral health clinics shall adhere to the federal model, including payment structures and rates.

A certified community behavioral health clinic means any licensed behavioral health organization that meets the federal certification criteria of Section 223 of the Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014. The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall define additional criteria to certify the clinics including, but not limited to, the provision of these services:

Outpatient mental health and substance use services;

Twenty-four (24) hour mobile crisis response and hotline services;

Screening, assessment, and diagnosis, including risk assessments;

Person-centered treatment planning;

Primary care screening and monitoring of key indicators of health risks;

Targeted case management;

Psychiatric rehabilitation services;

Peer support and family supports;

Medication-assisted treatment;

Assertive community treatment; and

Community-based mental health care for military service members and veterans.

Subject to the approval from the United States Department of Health and Human Services’ Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the certified community behavioral health clinic model pursuant to this chapter, shall be established by July 1, 2023, and include any enhanced Medicaid match for required services or populations served.

By August 1, 2022, the executive office of health and human services will issue the appropriate purchasing process and vehicle for organizations that want to participate in the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic model program.

By December 1, 2022, the organizations will submit a detailed cost report developed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals with approval from the executive office of health and human services, that includes the cost for the organization to provide the required services.

By January 15, 2023, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, in coordination with the executive office of health and human services, will prepare an analysis of proposals, determine how many behavioral health clinics can be certified in FY 2024 and the costs for each one. Funding for the Certified Behavioral Health Clinics will be included in the FY 2024 budget recommended by the Governor.

The executive office of health and human services shall apply for the federal Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics Demonstration Program if another round of funding becomes available.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 12, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.